Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1003
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act:

(1) Cancer means:

(a) A disease (i) caused by an uncontrolled division of abnormal cells in a part of the body or a malignant growth or tumor resulting from the division of abnormal cells and (ii) affecting the prostate, breast, or lung or the lymphatic, hematological, digestive, urinary, neurological, or reproductive system; or

(b) Melanoma; and

(2) Firefighter means:

(a) A firefighter or firefighter-paramedic who is a member of a paid fire department of a municipality or a rural or suburban fire protection district in this state, including a municipality having a home rule charter or a municipal authority created pursuant to a home rule charter that has its own paid fire department;

(b) A firefighter or firefighter-paramedic who is a member of a paid fire department of an airport authority; or

(c) A volunteer firefighter who has been deemed an employee under subdivision (3) of section 48-115.

Laws 2021, LB432, § 2.